Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-16] Civil penalty. Any person
who violates any provision of this chapter or its rules shall be fined not more
than $25,000 for each offense, and each day's violation or failure to comply
shall be deemed a separate offense. Fines shall be deposited with the director
to the credit of the compliance resolution fund pursuant to section 26-9(o).
Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this
chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available
under all other laws of this State. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next